Wisconsin, session 2025, AB832.
do enact as follows:AB832,11Section 1. 115.28 (67) of the statutes is created to read:AB832,2,102115.28 (67) Human trafficking and sextortion prevention; training 3courses. In consultation with the department of children and families and the 4department of justice, develop and maintain a list of recommended training courses 5related to recognizing, reporting, and preventing human trafficking and sextortion 6that are age-appropriate for pupils in grades 6 to 12. For purposes of this 7subsection, “sextortion” means sexual exploitation that includes the perpetrator 8receiving sexually explicit material from the victim and then threatening to release 9the sexually explicit material unless the victim sends the perpetrator money or 10additional sexual content or engages in sexual activity.AB832,211Section 2. 118.07 (5) of the statutes is renumbered 118.07 (5) (a).AB832,312Section 3. 118.07 (5) (b) of the statutes is created to read:AB832,2,1613118.07 (5) (b) The department shall include in the training required under 14par. (a) information related to identifying children who are or who are at risk of 15being victims of trafficking of a child under s. 948.051 or who are or who are at risk 16of being victims of sextortion, as defined in s. 115.28 (67).AB832,417Section 4. 121.02 (1) (L) 9. of the statutes is created to read:AB832,3,218121.02 (1) (L) 9. Beginning in the 2026-27 school year, as part of the health 19curriculum, provide instruction in human trafficking and sextortion prevention 1that is consistent with training courses recommended under s. 115.28 (67) at least 2once in grades 6 to 8 and at least once in grades 9 to 12.AB832,53Section 5. Initial applicability.AB832,3,54(1) The treatment of s. 121.02 (1) (L) 9. first applies to curriculum provided to 5pupils in the 2026-27 school year.AB832,3,66